Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1122.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Menopause Treatment Coverage.--(a) A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for hormonal and non-hormonal treatments for the management of menopausal symptoms. Coverage required under this section shall include all of the following:(1) Coverage for all drugs, devices and combination products 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of menopausal symptoms.(2) Coverage for behavioral therapy that assists individuals in coping with menopausal symptoms.(3) Coverage for therapy to treat menopause that has been induced by a hysterectomy.(b) Coverage required under this section shall be subject to the terms and conditions of a health insurance policy, including provisions relating to medical necessity, cost-sharing and utilization review.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost-sharing" means:(1) The share of health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee or covered person pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge.(3) The term does not include a premium, a balanced bill amount for an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Health insurance policy" means:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage on an expense-incurred or prepaid basis and that is offered by or is governed under any of the following:(i) This act, including section 630.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the " Health Maintenance Organization Act ." 20250SB1122PN1368 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Chs. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) and 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A dental only policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy issued under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(xiii) A homeowners' insurance policy.(xiv) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Hysterectomy" means a surgical procedure to remove a woman's uterus, which may include removal of the cervix, ovaries or fallopian tubes."Menopausal symptoms" means any of the following: (1) Irregular menstrual periods.(2) Hot flashes.(3) Vaginal or bladder changes.(4) Decreased fertility.20250SB1122PN1368 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Loss of bone density, including osteoporosis.(6) Elevated low-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels.(7) Sleep disturbances, including night sweats."Menopause" means t he permanent cessation of menstruation resulting from loss of ovarian follicular function, characterized by the end of ovulation and a decline in estrogen and progesterone production.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1122PN1368 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819